Oklahoma, session 2025, SB746.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 401 of Title 75A, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. As used in this section, “generative artificial


intelligence” means a machine-based system that can, for a given set


of human-defined objectives, emulate the structure and


characteristics of input data in order to generate derived synthetic


content, including images, videos, audio, text, and other digital


content.


B. A political advertisement, electioneering communication, or


other media regarding a candidate or election that is created or

Req. No. 982 Page 1


distributed by a candidate, candidate committee, political action


committee, or political party committee, as such terms are defined


in Section 187 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes, and that


contains an image, video, audio, text, or other digital content


created in whole or in part with the use of generative artificial


intelligence and appears to depict a real person performing an


action that did not occur in reality, must prominently include the


following disclosure: “Created in whole or in part with the use of


generative artificial intelligence.”


Such disclosure shall meet the following requirements:


1. For visual media, the text of the disclosure shall appear in


a size that is easily readable by the average viewer. For video,


the disclosure shall appear for the duration of the content created


in whole or in part with the use of generative artificial


intelligence; and


2. For media that is audio only, the disclosure shall be read


in a clearly spoken manner and in a pitch that can be easily heard


by the average listener at the beginning of the audio and at the end


of the audio.


C. A candidate whose appearance, action, or speech is depicted,


in whole or in part, through the use of generative artificial


intelligence may seek injunctive or other equitable relief


prohibiting the publication of such depiction or may bring an action


for general or special damages against the person or entity in

Req. No. 982 Page 2


violation of subsection B of this section. The court may award a


prevailing party court costs and reasonable attorney fees.


D. The requirements of this section shall not apply to:


1. A radio or television broadcasting station, including a


cable or satellite television operator, programmer, or producer,


that broadcasts media created in whole or in part with the use of


generative artificial intelligence as part of a bona fide newscast,


news interview, news documentary, or on-the-spot coverage of bona


fide news events, if the broadcast clearly acknowledges through


content or a disclosure, in a manner that can be easily heard or


read by the average listener or viewer, that there are questions


about the authenticity of such media;


2. A radio or television broadcasting station, including a


cable or satellite television operator, programmer, or producer,


when it is paid to broadcast media created in whole or in part with


the use of generative artificial intelligence and has made a good-


faith effort to establish that the depiction is not created in whole


or in part with the use of generative artificial intelligence;


3. An internet website, or a regularly published newspaper,


magazine, or other periodical of general circulation, including an


internet or electronic publication, that routinely carries news and


commentary of general interest, and that publishes media created in


whole or in part with the use of generative artificial intelligence



Req. No. 982 Page 3


if the publication clearly states that such media does not


accurately represent the speech or conduct of the candidate; or


4. Media created in whole or in part with the use of generative


artificial intelligence that constitutes satire or parody.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-982 CN 1/19/2025 5:42:26 AM



































Req. No. 982 Page 4